Washington statutes.
RCW 35.90.070

License change—When effective.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a general business license change enacted by a city whose general business license is issued through the business licensing system takes effect no sooner than 75 days after the department receives notice of the change if the change affects in any way who must obtain a license, who is exempt from obtaining a license, or the method of determining any fee for the issuance or renewal of a license.

(2) If a general business license change enacted by a city whose general business license is issued through the business licensing system only affects the amount of the fee for the issuance or renewal of the license, the change takes effect no sooner than 10 business days after the department receives notice of the change.

[ 2024 c 270 s 2; 2017 c 209 s 7.]